test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-sueaeq25_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - süä: # Noun (25) süä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     süä+N+Sg+Nom: süä
     süä+N+Sg+Gen: süäme
     süä+N+Sg+Par: süänd
     süä+N+Sg+Ill: [süämehe, süämede]
     süä+N+Sg+Ine: [süämen, süämeh, süämehn]
     süä+N+Sg+Ela: süämest
     süä+N+Sg+All: süämele
     süä+N+Sg+Ade: süämel
     süä+N+Sg+Abl: süämelt
     süä+N+Sg+Tra: süämes
     süä+N+Sg+Ter: süämeniq
     süä+N+Sg+Abe: süämeldäq
     süä+N+Sg+Com: süämegaq
     süä+N+Pl+Nom: süämeq
     süä+N+Pl+Gen: [süämide, süämiide]
     süä+N+Pl+Par: [süämit, süämiid]
     süä+N+Pl+Ill: [süämihe, süämiihe, süändehe, süämide, süämiide, süändede]
     süä+N+Pl+Ine: [süämin, süämih, süämihn, süämiin, süämiih, süämiihn, süänden, süändeh, süändehn]
     süä+N+Pl+Ela: [süämist, süämiist, süändest]
     süä+N+Pl+All: [süämile, süämiile, süändele]
     süä+N+Pl+Ade: [süämil, süämiil, süändel]
     süä+N+Pl+Abl: [süämilt, süämiilt, süändelt]
     süä+N+Pl+Tra: [süämis, süämiis, süändes]
     süä+N+Pl+Ter: [süäminiq, süämiiniq, süändeniq]
     süä+N+Pl+Abe: [süämildäq, süämiildäq, süändeldäq]
     süä+N+Pl+Com: [süämidegaq, süämiidegaq, süändegaq]
